Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5594.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "data center regulation act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Data center" means a facility in this state that is composed of 1 or more buildings and that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, data center equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data. (b) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (c) "Local unit of government" means a county, township, city, or village or an agency or instrumentality of a county, township, city, or village. (d) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. Sec. 5. Beginning on the effective date of this act and until April 1, 2027, a local unit of government shall not issue, grant, or approve a site plan, permit, land use or activity, variance, easement, certificate, or other authorization for a data center. Sec. 7. Beginning on the effective date of this act and until April 1, 2027, the department shall not issue, grant, or approve a license, permit, or other authorization for a data center. Sec. 9. Beginning on the effective date of this act and until April 1, 2027, a person shall not begin operation of a data center. Sec. 11. A person that violates section 9 is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 for each day of violation. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to enjoin the violation and collect the fine. A fine collected under this section must be deposited in the general fund. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06189'26 a) or House Bill No. 5596 (request no. H06189'26 a) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.